Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5399.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "data center nondisclosure agreement prohibition act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Data center" means an enterprise data center as that term is defined in section 4ee of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.54ee. (b) "Nondisclosure agreement" means an agreement or contract that includes a provision or clause that provides that the construction of a data center is confidential or that a party to the agreement or contract is prohibited from disclosing, discussing, describing, or commenting on the construction of a data center. (c) "Political subdivision" means a county, city, village, township, or other political subdivision, public corporation, authority, or district of this state. Sec. 3. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an elected official of a political subdivision shall not enter into a nondisclosure agreement. (2) An elected official who violates this act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. Sec. 5. (1) This act applies to a nondisclosure agreement that is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this act. (2) An agreement or contract, or a provision of an agreement or contract, that violates this act is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.